Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 2. Districts and District Boards

§ 11-6-201.
Creation
and designation of districts; state predator management advisory board.

Each county is created and designated as a predator management district. Each district shall be known as the “Predator Management District of . . . . . County, Wyoming,” and it may hold property and be a party to suits and contracts.

There is created a state predator management advisory board composed of one (1) representative of each predator management district. The state predator management advisory board representative shall be appointed by the individual predator management district boards of directors and so designated in writing.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 36, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 56-2502; W.S. 1957, § 11-99; W.S. 1977, §

11-6-301

; Laws 1977, ch. 125, § 1; 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1990, ch. 87, § 2; 2006, ch. 87, § 1.

The 2006 amendment

substituted “predator management” for “predatory animal” in (a) and (b).

Laws 2006, ch. 87, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2006.

Cross references. —

As to the Wyoming Animal Damage Management Program, see article 3 of chapter 6 of this title.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 227.

§ 11-6-202.
Administration
of districts by district boards; number and qualifications of members;
term; filling of vacancies; removal.

The affairs of each district shall be administered by a board of directors, each of whom shall be a bona fide resident of Wyoming. Directors for the positions identified in paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this subsection shall be elected at an annual meeting of district livestock owners. Directors for the positions identified in paragraphs (iv) and (v) of this subsection shall be appointed as described. The composition of the board shall be as follows:

Three (3) directors shall be sheep owners having paid predator management fees on sheep in the district in the year preceding election. At each subsequent annual district meeting one (1) director shall be elected for a three (3) year term. Subject to the provisions of W.S. 11-6-203(a), all sheep owners whether an individual, corporation or partnership, having paid predator management fees on sheep in the district regardless of the domicile of the sheep, are entitled to one (1) vote at the meeting;

Three (3) directors shall be cattle owners having paid predator management fees on cattle in the district in the year preceding election. At each subsequent annual district meeting one (1) director shall be elected for a three (3) year term. Subject to the provisions of W.S. 11-6-203(a), all cattle owners whether an individual, corporation or partnership, having paid predator management fees on cattle in the district regardless of the domicile of the cattle, are entitled to one (1) vote at the meeting;

If a qualified applicant for a director position identified in paragraph (i) or (ii) of this subsection cannot be found or if no qualified applicant seeks election to the board of directors, then the director position may be filled by an otherwise qualified elector, provided no more than four (4) directors may represent any one (1) species of livestock;

The board of county commissioners shall appoint one (1) director to serve for an initial term of two (2) years and thereafter for three (3) year terms from electors in the county not engaged in raising sheep or cattle. No appointed member may serve for a consecutive period of more than six (6) years;

If the board of directors determines state funds are necessary for an effective predator management program to assure the statutory requirements provided in W.S.

11-6-205

are fulfilled and state funds are appropriated and received for that purpose, then three (3) directors representing sportsmen and hunters from the district shall be appointed to the board of directors by the county commissioners serving the local district. Sportsmen and hunter representatives shall be bona fide residents of the district not engaged in raising sheep or cattle and shall hold or have held a valid Wyoming fishing or hunting license within the preceding twelve (12) month period. County commissioners, to the greatest extent practical, shall select sportsmen and hunter representatives to ensure representation from as broad a geographic distribution of the district as possible. The county commissioners shall determine who of the three (3) sportsmen and hunter directors appointed to a board under this paragraph shall serve an initial term of one (1) year, who shall serve an initial term of (2) years and who shall serve a term of three (3) years. Thereafter, each term shall be for three (3) years.

No director shall continue to hold office after disqualification under any of the provisions of this section. All vacancies on the district board may be filled for unexpired terms by the other directors in office except the public member’s and the sportsmen and hunter member’s unexpired term shall be filled by board of county commissioners appointment. All members shall hold their offices until their successors are elected and qualified.

For directors appointed by a board of county commissioners, the county commissioners may remove the director for cause without a public hearing unless the director requests that the action be taken during a public hearing.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 36, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 56-2503; W.S. 1957, § 11-100; W.S. 1977, §

11-6-302

; Laws 1977, ch. 125, § 1; 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1990, ch. 87, § 2; 2006, ch. 87, § 1; 2010, ch. 61, § 1; 2012, ch. 46, § 1; ch. 104, § 1; 2020 ch. 48, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

The 2006 amendment

rewrote (a), inserting “for the positions identified in paragraphs (iv) and (v) of this subsection,” inserted “or goat,” substituted “predator management” for “predatory animal,” inserted (iii), and (v); inserted “and the sportsmen and hunter member’s” in (b); and made similar and stylistic changes throughout.

Laws 2006, ch. 87, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2006.

The 2010 amendment,

in (a), deleted all references to goats.

Laws 2010, ch. 61, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2010.

The 2012 amendments.—

The first 2012 amendment, by ch 46, § 1, effective July 1, 2012, inserted “Subject to the provisions of W.S. 11-6-203(a)” in (a)(i) and (a)(ii).

The second 2012 amendment, by ch. 104, § 1, added (c).

Laws 2012, ch. 104 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 21, 2012.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in (a)(v), substituted “a valid Wyoming fishing or hunting license within” for “either a valid Wyoming fishing or hunting license or a Wyoming wildlife damage management stamp within.”

§ 11-6-203.
Manner
of calling annual meeting of predator management districts; when held;
election of chairman and secretary.

The annual meeting of each predator management district shall be held within the first two (2) weeks of December. Any person having paid predator fees in the district within the preceding twelve (12) months shall be entitled to one (1) vote at the annual meeting. Predator fees paid in the name of a business entity may be represented by one (1) representative of the entity paying the fees, provided that the representative is authorized by the entity to vote on behalf of the entity and has provided proof of such written authorization. Proof of payment of predator fees within the district shall only be through a verified copy of a brand inspection certificate which clearly shows that the fees have been paid and the date upon which the fees were paid. No person paying fees within the district shall be entitled to more than one (1) vote at the annual meeting and no proxies shall be allowed. Each board shall:

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 46, § 2.

Publish a notice stating the time and place of any meeting of the district and that directors of the board representing livestock interests as provided in W.S. 11-6-202(a)(i) and (ii) shall be elected at the meeting. Notice shall be published once in a newspaper of general circulation in the district ten (10) days prior to the date of the meeting;

Set the date of the meeting so as not to conflict with the date of similar meetings held in adjoining districts in order that sheep and cattle owners operating in more than one (1) district may attend and vote in other districts where they are engaged in such business;

Set the annual predatory animal control fee for the district as provided by W.S. 11-6-210(a).

When assembled in accordance with the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the sheep and cattle owners shall elect a chairman and secretary who shall act as judges of the election of directors representing livestock interests of the board.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 36, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 56-2504; W.S. 1957, § 11-101; W.S. 1977, §

11-6-303

; Laws 1977, ch. 125, § 1; 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1990, ch. 87, § 2; 1996, ch. 41, § 1; 2006, ch. 87, § 1; 2010, ch. 61, § 1; 2012, ch. 46, §§ 1, 2.

The 2006 amendment,

in (a), substituted “predator management” for “predatory animal,” inserted “goats,” inserted “held within the first two (2) weeks of,” in (i), deleted “assessed for taxes or,” following “persons,” inserted “representing livestock interests as provided in W.S. 11-6-202(a)(i) and (ii)”; and made similar changes in (b).

Laws 2006, ch. 87, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2006.

The 2010 amendment,

in (a)(i), substituted “sheep or cattle” for “sheep, goats, or cattle”; and in (b), substituted “sheep and cattle” for “sheep, goat, and cattle.”

Laws 2010, ch. 61, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2010.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, inserted the present second through fifth sentences in the introductory language of (a); and repealed former (a)(i), which read: “On or before December 1, obtain an accurate list of all persons who have paid predator management fees on sheep or cattle in the district.”

§ 11-6-204.
District
boards; election and appointment of officers; meetings; quorum; oath;
appropriation requests.

At the annual meeting
of the district board, following election of directors pursuant to W.S. 11-6-202(a)(i), (ii) and (iv) and upon appointment of directors pursuant
to W.S. 11-6-202(a)(v), if applicable, the directors shall organize by choosing
from their number a president and vice-president and shall appoint
a secretary-treasurer. Subsequent meetings may be called by the president
upon reasonable notice. A majority of the board constitutes a quorum
for the transaction of business at any board meeting. The members
of the board shall receive no compensation for serving as members.
Each director shall take an oath for the faithful performance of his
duties. If the board determines to request an appropriation of funds
from the board of county commissioners, it shall, at least thirty
(30) days prior to the time for annual levy of general taxes, notify
the board of county commissioners of the amount the district board
considers necessary for district operations during the following year.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 36, § 5; 1945, ch. 8, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 56-2505; W.S. 1957, § 11-102; W.S. 1977, §

11-6-304

; Laws 1977, ch. 125, § 1; 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1990, ch. 87, § 2; 2006, ch. 87, § 1.

The 2006 amendment

rewrote the first sentence concerning the annual meeting of the board in relation to W.S.

11-6-202

.

Laws 2006, ch. 87, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2006.

For discussion of legislative history of section,

see State ex rel. Albany County Weed & Pest Dist. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 592 P.2d 1154,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 393

(Wyo. 1979).

§ 11-6-205.
District
boards; duties generally.

Each predator management district board shall:

Exercise general supervision over the control of predatory animals and predacious birds that prey upon and destroy livestock, other domestic animals and wildlife;

Devise and put in operation those methods that best manage or control damage caused by predatory animals or predacious birds;

Administer funds received from predator management fees and from other sources to carry out the predator management program;

Coordinate with affected individuals and entities to develop a comprehensive predator management program for each respective predator management district which addresses livestock, wildlife and public health concerns.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 36, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 56-2501; W.S. 1957, § 11-103; W.S. 1977, §

11-6-305

; Laws 1977, ch. 125, § 1; 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1990, ch. 87, § 2; 2006, ch. 87, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

in (a), substituted “predator management” for “predatory animal,” inserted “predacious birds,” substituted “wildlife” for “wild game,” inserted “damage caused,” and made similar changes in (i) through (iii), added (iv), and made related changes.

Laws 2006, ch. 87, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2006.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Quoted

in

In re Gimlin, 403 P.2d 178,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 1965).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 227.

§ 11-6-206.
District boards; powers generally.

Each predator management district board may adopt rules and regulations necessary for carrying out the purpose and provisions of this article. Each board may appoint employees and assistants as necessary and fix their compensation. Each board may work through the department to coordinate predator control including contracting for predator control services or may directly enter into cooperative agreements with boards of county commissioners, other predator management districts, the animal damage management board, federal or state agencies or other organizations or associations for the purpose of controlling predatory animals and predacious birds. Each board is authorized to pay bounties for predatory animals and predacious birds.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 36, § 8; C.S. 1945, § 56-2508; W.S. 1957, § 11-104; W.S. 1977, §

11-6-306

; Laws 1977, ch. 125, § 1; 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1990, ch. 87, § 2; 2006, ch. 87, § 1; 2022 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2006 amendment

substituted “predator management” for “predatory animal,” and inserted “predacious birds.”

Laws 2006, ch. 87, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2006.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in the third sentence, added “work through the department to coordinate predator control including contracting for predator control services or may directly” and “the animal damage management board,”.

Quoted

in

In re Gimlin, 403 P.2d 178,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 1965).

§ 11-6-207.
District
boards; record of proceedings and expenditures; monthly warrants issued
by county for monies collected.

The secretary-treasurer of each predator management district shall keep a complete and accurate record of the proceedings of the board.

All salaries, expenses or bounties shall be paid from the predator management district fund of the district by the secretary-treasurer.

All expenditures of the district shall be supported by properly approved vouchers and supporting documents in writing signed by the board president and any other director.

The county treasurer shall issue monthly warrants to the predator management district for all monies collected in the county for the predator management district.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 36, § 10; C.S. 1945, § 56-2510; W.S. 1957, § 11-105; Laws 1971, ch. 167, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

11-6-307

; Laws 1977, ch. 125, § 1; 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2006, ch. 87, § 1.

The 2006 amendment

substituted “predator management” for “predatory animal” in (a), (b), and (d).

Laws 2006, ch. 87, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2006.

§ 11-6-208.
District
boards; annual report.

On or before October
1 of each year, the president and secretary-treasurer of each district
board and each county treasurer shall make an annual report to their
board of county commissioners showing all receipts and disbursement
of district funds made by direction of the board during the preceding
fiscal year. A report of the receipts, expenditures and financial
transactions of the district shall be made as provided by W.S.

9-1-507

. The director of the state department of audit may call
upon any district board or upon any county treasurer for further information
relating to any predator management district.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 36, § 11; C.S. 1945, § 56-2511; W.S. 1957, § 11-106; W.S. 1977, §

11-6-308

; Laws 1977, ch. 125, § 1; 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 75, § 1; 2006, ch. 87, § 1; 2009, ch. 90, § 2.

The 2006 amendment,

substituted “predator management” for “predatory animal.”

Laws 2006, ch. 87, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2006.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “October 1” for “January 1” and “fiscal” for “calendar” preceding “year” in the first sentence.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 90, § 4, effective July 1, 2009, provides: “It is the intent of this act to impose a fiscal year of July 1 through June 30 on all governmental entities in this state, including all agencies, boards, commissions, institutions, instrumentalities, political subdivisions and special districts, no matter how formed, unless specifically exempted or otherwise authorized by law. The intent of this act is to repeal any noncodified provision which conflicts with the provisions of this act, including but not limited to earlier adopted government reorganization acts. Any entity required to change its current fiscal year of operation may elect to extend its current fiscal year or shorten its current fiscal year and commence its next fiscal year on July 1, 2009 or July 1, 2010, as it finds most convenient and efficient for its circumstances.”

§ 11-6-209.
Annual
meetings of predator management boards.

Annual meetings for the
election of members of boards of directors of predator management
districts shall be called by the president of each board. The meetings
shall be called by a notice published in the manner provided by W.S.

11-6-203

.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 36, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 56-2506; W.S. 1957, § 11-107; W.S. 1977, §

11-6-309

; Laws 1977, ch. 125, § 1; 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1990, ch. 87, § 2; 2006, ch. 87, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

substituted “predator management” for “predatory animal.”

Laws 2006, ch. 87, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2006.

§ 11-6-210.
Creation
of predator management district fund; predator management fees; donations;
appropriation by county commissioners.

At the time of collecting brand inspection fees imposed under W.S.

11-20-401

and

11-20-402

, the brand inspector shall collect predator management fees on all sheep and cattle inspected within each predator management district. However, predator management fees shall not be collected on cattle and sheep shipped into this state for immediate sale or slaughter. The amount of the fee for each predator management district shall be established by each predator management district board in consultation with the state predator management advisory board and shall not exceed one dollar ($1.00) per head on sheep and cattle. The directors elected pursuant to W.S. 11-6-202(a)(i) and (ii) from each predator management district board shall annually determine the predator management fee to be charged and collected in the district taking into consideration comments solicited from the producers present at the district’s annual meeting as provided for in W.S.

11-6-203

, who have paid predator management fees within the district during the preceding twelve (12) months and shall inform the livestock board of the fee prior to January 1 each year. The fee shall not be collected on the same livestock more than once in any twelve (12) month period. The livestock board may retain not to exceed five percent (5%) of the revenues collected for the actual cost of collecting the predator management fee. Remaining revenues collected by the livestock board under this section shall be remitted to the state treasurer for deposit in an account. The state treasurer, on a quarterly basis, shall distribute the revenues to the county treasurer of the county from which the shipment originated unless, at the time of payment of the fees, the livestock owner designates the fees to be distributed in total to another county in this state in which the livestock are fed or pastured. The county treasurer shall deposit revenues distributed under this subsection into a special continuing fund, to be known as the “Predator Management District Fund of . . . . . County” and to be administered by the predator management board of that district.

and (c) Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 87, § 3.

The district board may receive donations and appropriations of money from any source, and such donations and appropriations shall be placed in the district fund by the county treasurer upon request of the district board. Nothing in W.S.

11-6-201

through

11-6-210

shall be construed to prohibit boards of county commissioners from appropriating funds for the purpose of controlling predatory animals and predacious birds, and such appropriation by boards of county commissioners is authorized.

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 87, § 3.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the amount of the annual predator management fee for sheep and cattle shipped into this state for confinement in a commercial feedlot shall not exceed twenty-five cents ($0.25) per head on sheep and cattle. For purposes of this subsection, “commercial feedlot” means any place, establishment or facility commonly known as a feedlot conducted, operated or managed for profit or nonprofit for livestock producers, feeders or market agencies, consisting of pens and their appurtenances, in which livestock are received, held, fed, cared for or kept for sale or shipment in commerce. A pasture, field or other enclosure, fenced or unfenced, shall not be considered a commercial feedlot for purposes of this subsection. The predator management district board shall have the authority to determine if a facility qualifies as a commercial feedlot as defined in this subsection.

Each predator management district board shall annually allocate five percent (5%) of all predator management fee collections to be used for refunds, in whole or in part. If a refund is requested the board shall pay the refund within one hundred twenty (120) days after the end of the calendar year in which the fee was paid. Refunds under this subsection shall be subject to the following:

To be valid, the application for refund shall be received no later than sixty (60) days after the end of the calendar year in which the fee was paid;

No person receiving a refund shall receive any predatory animal control services funded in whole or in part by the predatory animal control fees until that person has paid one hundred fifty percent (150%) of all refunds received during the year in which the services were sought and the three (3) preceding calendar years; and

All monies not paid in refunds shall annually revert to the district predator management account on July 1 of the following year.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, no predatory animal control fee shall be collected on livestock shipped or trailed within this state if change of ownership does not occur.

Any person failing to pay the predator animal control fee imposed by subsection (a) or (f) of this section shall be punished as provided by W.S.

11-1-103

.

In addition to the other fees imposed by this section, any person paying the predator control fee may pay an additional ten cents ($.10) per head to fund the predator management activities of the Wyoming animal damage management board created by W.S.

11-6-303

. Any fees collected pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited in the animal damage management account created by W.S.

11-6-306

.

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 46, § 2.

If a livestock producer requests predator management services from the district board representing the county in which the producer is pasturing or housing livestock, and no predator management fees have been collected from the producer within the previous twelve (12) months, or if the fees have been refunded, the board may charge a service fee to recover reasonable and actual costs of the predator management services provided.

To be eligible to receive state funds, the district shall assess and collect all available fees on livestock in the district.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 36, § 7; 1945, ch. 8, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 56-2507; Laws 1950, Sp. Sess., ch. 11, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-108; Laws 1963, ch. 85, § 1; 1969, ch. 103, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

11-6-310

; Laws 1977, ch. 125, § 1; 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1990, ch. 87, §§ 2, 3; 1991, ch. 78, § 1; ch. 129, § 1; 1994, ch. 96, § 1; 1996, ch. 41, § 1; 1999, ch. 197, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 23, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2006, ch. 87, § 1, ch. 114, § 1; 2010, ch. 61, § 1; ch. 69, § 207; 2012, ch. 46, §§ 1, 2.

The 2005 amendment

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” at the end of the third-to-last sentence in (a).

The 2006 amendments. —

The first 2006 amendment, by ch. 87, § 1, rewrote (a) regarding the elected directors and the collection of fees, changed fee dollar amounts and percentages, substituted “predator management” for “predatory animal” throughout; inserted “goats” in (a) and (f); inserted “and predacious birds” in (d); added (n) and (o); and made similar changes throughout.

The second 2006 amendment, by ch. 114, § 1, substituted “subsection” for “subsections” in (j).

Laws 2006, ch. 87, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2006.

Pursuant to the conflicting laws provision in ch. 114, both have been given effect in their section as set out.

The 2010 amendments. —

The first 2010 amendment, by ch. 61, § 1, in (a) and (f), deleted all references to goats, and made related changes.

The second 2010 amendment, by ch. 69, § 207, effective July 1, 2010, deleted “After January 1, 1992” at the beginning of the introductory language of (g).

Laws 2010, ch. 61, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2010.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “one hundred twenty (120) days after the end of the calendar year in which the fee was paid” for “one hundred eighty (180) days of application” in the introductory language of (g); and repealed former (m) pertaining to special meetings of the predatory animal control board to adjust predatory animal control fees.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3 provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

For discussion of legislative history of section,

see State ex rel. Albany County Weed & Pest Dist. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 592 P.2d 1154,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 393

(Wyo. 1979).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 227.